New York, session 2025-2026, A8956.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6807 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. A pharmacist may dispense drugs, including veterinary-specific 4 compounded medications, to a veterinarian, and a veterinarian may 5 possess and keep in stock for administration and sale, such drugs pursu- 6 ant to a non-patient specific regimen prescribed or ordered by any prac- 7 titioner of veterinary medicine licensed pursuant to article one hundred 8 thirty-five of this title. Provided, however, that any dispensing of 9 drugs containing opioids or other controlled substances shall be subject 10 to limitations determined by the department of health. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00036-01-5